Illinois, session 104th, HB4722.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by adding 5Section 16.2 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 105/16.2 new)7    Sec. 16.2. Will depository. 8    (a) The clerk of any circuit court may establish and 9maintain a will depository for the voluntary safekeeping of 10original wills before the death of the testator.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Certified death certificate" means a record of death 13issued by a governmental vital records authority that is 14certified as a true copy and does not include an 15electronically transmitted certificate unless expressly 16authorized by the clerk.17    "Depository" or "will depository" means the secure, sealed 18repository for original wills established and maintained under 19this Section.20    "Depositor" means the person delivering the will for 21deposit and includes:22        (1) the testator, who is a resident in the county 23    where the will is being deposited; or  HB4722 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17379 JRC 30804 b1        (2) a person authorized by court order.2    "Sealed envelope" means an envelope approved by the clerk 3that conceals the contents of the will and bears the clerk's 4identifying marks, date of deposit, and index number.5    "Testator" means the person who executed the will being 6deposited and whose death will trigger release of the will.7    "Will" means a document deposited by a person intended to 8be a testamentary instrument.9    "Withdrawal" means the physical return of the deposited 10will to the testator or to a person authorized to receive the 11will under subsection (h).12    (c) A depositor may deposit a will of a living person with 13the clerk under this Section. The depositor must be a resident 14of the county in which the will is being deposited. The clerk 15may assume, without inquiring further, that the depositor of 16the will is correct about the depositor's county of residence.17    (d) The clerk may charge a fee up to $25 for each will 18deposited. The clerk shall not collect a separate fee for 19additional documents concurrently deposited in relation to a 20single testator or for a single joint will prepared for a 21spouse or legally married person. These fees shall be included 22in the fee schedule established under this Section and may be 23revised as provided in this Section.24    (e) Upon receipt of a will under this Section, the clerk 25shall:26        (1) provide the depositor with a receipt for the will,   HB4722 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17379 JRC 30804 b1    and the receipt shall contain the information designated 2    on the envelope in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 3    subsection;4        (2) place the will or wills deposited concurrently in 5    relation to a single testator in one envelope and seal the 6    envelope securely in the presence of the depositor;7        (3) designate on the envelope:8            (A) the date of deposit;9            (B) the name, address, and telephone number of the 10        depositor;11            (C) the full legal name and last known address of 12        the testator as provided by the depositor;13            (D) the full legal names of the executor or 14        co-executors; and 15            (E) with respect to each document enclosed:16                (i) a short description of the document, 17            including, if shown, its date of execution; and18                (ii) the number of pages in the document; and19        (4) index the will alphabetically by the name of the 20    testator and by the alternate names set forth by which the 21    testator may have been known.22    (f) An envelope and will deposited under this Section are 23not public records or court records, and are prohibited from 24public access and inspection.25    At the depositor's option, the depositor shall disclose 2 26of the 3 listed pieces of information:  HB4722 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17379 JRC 30804 b1        (1) alternate names by which the testator may have 2    been known;3        (2) the testator's birth date, and4        (3) the last 4 digits of the testator's social 5    security number.6    (g) During the testator's lifetime, the clerk shall keep 7the envelope containing the will sealed.8    (h) During the testator's lifetime, the clerk may release 9the deposited will only to:10        (1) the testator in person upon proof of identity; or11        (2) a court pursuant to an order.12    No other person may inspect, copy, or obtain information 13concerning the contents of the will.14    (i) The clerk shall release the testator's sealed will 15envelope to any of the executors named on the front of the 16envelope if presented with a certified death certificate of 17the testator or with a certified copy of an order of court 18determining the testator to be deceased. To receive the sealed 19will envelope the executor must provide proof of identity. If 2012 months from the testator's date of death have elapsed, and 21no named executor has removed the sealed will envelope from 22the depository, the clerk shall release it to any heir, 23creditor, or interested party who presents a court order 24granting them the authority to receive it.25    The testator may withdraw the deposited will at any time 26upon written request and proof of identity. A will withdrawn   HB4722 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17379 JRC 30804 b1under this subsection is no longer subject to this Section.2    (j) If 100 years have elapsed from the date of deposit, and 3the clerk has not received either a certified death 4certificate or a withdrawal request, the clerk may destroy the 5sealed will without further notice.6    (k) The clerk is not liable for loss or destruction of a 7will deposited under this Section, except for willful 8misconduct. If a will cannot be located within a reasonable 9period of time, the clerk's office will provide certification 10with the information contained in subparagraphs (A) through 11(D) of paragraph (3) of subsection (e).12    (l) The clerk may adopt forms, affidavits, withdrawal 13procedures, and other rules necessary to administer this 14Section.15    (m) The depositing of a will with any clerk does not confer 16validity upon the will or any greater or lesser legal weight, 17validity, consideration, or priority than any other will of 18the same testator or testators under the provisions of the 19Probate Act of 1975.